Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-1203
Judicial Resources Commission; expenses.

Members of the Judicial Resources Commission shall be reimbursed for expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1992, LB 1059, § 9;

R.S.Supp.,1994, § 24-809.03;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 20.